Nebraska, session 109, LB392.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB392 LB392
2025 2025
1 Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $XXX from the General Fund
2 for FY2025-26 and $XXX from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
3 Legislative Council, for Program 122.
4 Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
5 passed and approved according to law.
-2-